Washington statutes.
RCW 33.48.320

Waiver of chapter requirements.

If, in the opinion of the director, it is necessary for any of the requirements of this chapter to be waived in order to permit an association which is in danger of failing to convert its charter from a mutual association to a stock association or from a stock association to a mutual association so that the association may be acquired by an association or a savings and loan holding company, then the director may waive any such requirement.

[ 1994 c 92 s 493; 1982 c 3 s 112.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 3: See note following RCW 33.04.002.